Utah statutes.
59-12-1403.   Distribution of revenues -- Administrative costs.
(1) (a)  The city or town legislative body shall by ordinance provide for the
distribution of the entire amount of the revenues generated by the tax imposed
by this part in accordance with this section.
(b)  A city or town may participate in an interlocal agreement provided for
under Section 59-12-704 and distribute the revenues generated by the tax
imposed by this part to participants in the interlocal agreement.
(c)  The revenues generated by the tax shall be used for one or more
organizations or facilities defined in Section 59-12-702.
(2)  The commission may retain an amount not to exceed 1-1/2% of the tax
collected under this part for the cost of administering this part.
